Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.400

Bank acquisition or control—Definitions.

As used in RCW 30A.04.400 through 30A.04.410, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(1) "Control" means directly or indirectly alone or in concert with others to own, control, or hold the power to vote twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding stock or voting power of the "controlled" entity;

(2) "Acquiring party" means the person acquiring control of a bank through the purchase of stock; and

(3) "Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, business trust, or other organization.

[ 2014 c 37 s 133; 1977 ex.s. c 246 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.04.400.]